Hawaii statutes.
[§340B-3.5] Wastewater treatment
certification board special fund. (a) There is established in the state
treasury a special fund to be known as the wastewater treatment certification
board special fund. The following moneys collected by the board shall be
deposited into the special fund:

(1) Registration fees for examinations;

(2) Renewal fees;

(3) Reciprocity fees; and

(4) Temporary certificates fees.

All interest earned or accrued on moneys deposited
into the special fund shall become a part of the special fund.

(b) All moneys paid into the special fund
shall be expended by the board to finance its operations. [L 1999, c 238, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next